Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1701
Act, how cited.

Sections 43-1701 to 43-1743 shall be known and may be cited
as the Income Withholding for Child Support Act.

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 21;

Laws 1991, LB 457, § 17;

Laws 1994, LB 1224, § 64;

Laws 2000, LB 972, § 19;

Laws 2010, LB712, § 27.